Washington statutes.
RCW 18.160.070

Local government regulation—Application to state and government contractors.

(1) Nothing in this chapter limits the power of a municipality, county, or the state to regulate the quality and character of work performed by contractors, through a system of permits, fees, and inspections which are designed to assure compliance with and aid in the implementation of state and local building laws or to enforce other local laws for the protection of the public health and safety. Nothing in this chapter limits the power of the municipality, county, or the state to adopt any system of permits requiring submission to and approval by the municipality, county, or the state, of technical drawings and specifications for work to be performed by contractors before commencement of the work. The official authorized to issue building or other related permits shall ascertain that the fire protection sprinkler system contractor is duly licensed by requiring evidence of a valid fire protection sprinkler system contractor's license.

(2) This chapter applies to any fire protection sprinkler system contractor performing work for any municipality, county, or the state. Officials of any municipality, county, or the state are required to determine compliance with this chapter before awarding any contracts for the installation, repair, service, alteration, fabrication, addition, or inspection of a fire protection sprinkler system.

[ 1990 c 177 s 8.]